Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6121.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the regents shall have power to enact ordinances, by-laws, and regulations for the government of the university; to elect a president, to fix, increase, and reduce the regular number of professors and tutors, and to appoint the same, and to determine the amount of their salaries. : Provided, That However, there shall must always be at least 1 professor of homeopathy in the department of medicine. (2) The regents shall comply with all local ordinances and local zoning requirements for any land acquired by the regents on or after January 1, 2027. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Joint Resolution X (request no. H06557'26) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.